Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-601.01
Caucus; when held; notice.

In any village the board of trustees may, by ordinance, call a caucus for the purpose of nomination of candidates for offices to be filled in the village election. Such caucus shall be held at least ten days before the filing deadline for such election, and the village board of trustees shall publish notice of such caucus in at least one legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the village at least once each week for two consecutive weeks before such caucus.

Laws 1971, LB 432, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 1047, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 199.